Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2698.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 44-72-3 and 44-72-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-72 entitled
"Non-Owner Occupied Property Tax Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
44-72-3. Definitions.
The following words and phrases as used in this chapter have the following meanings:
(1) “Administrator” means the tax administrator within the department of revenue.
(2) “Assessed value” means the assessed value of the real estate as of December 31 of the
corresponding taxable year in accordance with § 44-5-12.
(3) “Non-owner occupied” means that the residential property does not serve as the owner’s
primary residence and is not occupied by the owner of the property for a majority of days during a
given taxable year.
(4) “Non-owner occupied tax” means the assessment imposed upon the non-owner
occupied residential property assessed at one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more pursuant to this
chapter and as adjusted pursuant to § 44-72-6.
(5) “Person” means any individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, joint
stock association, and the legal successor thereof or any other entity or group organization against
which a tax may be assessed.
(6) "Seasonably-habitable non-owner occupied residences" means that the residential
property does not serve as the owner’s primary residence and is not occupied by the owner or a
tenant of the property for a majority of days during a given taxable year, and are only seasonally

occupied. These residences shall have exposed water pipes that are required to be drained during
the winter months and shall not be equipped with a means of providing heat to the residence.
(6)(7) “Taxable year” means July 1 through June 30.
44-72-5. Exemptions.
(a) This chapter does not supersede any applicable exemption in the general or public laws.
In no case shall this chapter apply to, or any tax therefrom be assessed against, any properties or
buildings that are rented or were rented for a period of more than one hundred eighty-three (183)
days during the prior taxable year and subject to the provisions of chapter 18 of title 34 or any
properties or buildings that are rented or were rented and are subject to tax pursuant to chapter 18
of this title.
(b) This chapter shall not apply to seasonably-habitable non-owner occupied residences
between the dates of October 15, and May 15 of each taxable year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005664
========
LC005664 - Page 2 of 3